Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.320

Annexation of territory authorized—Consent by city.

Any territory contiguous to a district may be annexed to the district.

If the territory to be annexed is in a city, consent to the annexation shall first be obtained from the governing body of the city. An authenticated copy of the resolution or order of that body consenting to the annexation shall be attached to the annexation petition.

[ 1957 c 153 s 32.]